updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_sq_AL.dic
e3sh3t3r4y
e3sh3nj4a
e3nj3j4a
o3nu
a3f3sh3t4a
e3n3k4ë
a3n3sh4a
e3p3ç4i
i3l3m4a
y3k3j4a
a4j3shi
a3r3c4i
a3xho
o3r3gj4e
a3l3t4a
e3n3d4a
y3rro
u3r3s4i
o3k3s3p4u
o3v3dh4ë
e3g3r4y
u3t3b4o
e3r3n4o
i3dhi
o3n3p4ë
i3m3s3j4e
a3dh3t4o
i3k3m4e
e3th3q4a
u3p3s4a
o3z3sh4a
e3sh3k3th4i
e4j3si
u3r3p4i
e3r3dh3m4ë
ë3n3d3m4a
a3s3f4i
e3l3sh4ë
e4j3ngo
e4j3shpe
ë3mi
e3s3k4a
i3m3n4o
a4j3ka
y3sh3k3r4u
u3bi
u3sh3t4a
i3xa
e3hu
u3r3z4a
o3s3q4ë
i3k3z4i
e3p3c4a
u3f3rr4i
e3n3g3r4i
a4j3zi
o3p3n4i
o3ç3sh4a
a4j3shme
e3dh3t4a
e3p3s3k4a
e3s3p4u
a3hu
u3r3xh4i
i3l3n3d4e
ë3b3l4o
i3r3t3b3l4o
o3sh3r4a
u3q3j4e
e3r3j4a
a3t3ç4i
i3r3t3sh3k3r4e
i3k3r4e
e3n3d3b4a
a3r3f4i
i3c3k3r4i
a3m3b3d4a
o4j3ce
y3s3m4ë
a3s3z3gj4e
e3k3z4o
u3n3m4i
o4j3shme
i3sh3k3k4e
a3s3v4e
o3shy
a3m3b3l4o
u3cë
a3m3k4ë
a3b3l3j4a
u3ll3n3g4u
i3h3j4a
e3s3k3p4o
y3sh3s3t4e
a3r3dh4u
i3ti
ë3nji
a3l3th3t4ë
a3h3s3t4u
e3bi
o3rr3j4a
e3n3k4i
o3ll3j4e
a3r3t3r4a
ë3r3m4a
u3q3l4ë
a3r3sh4a
i3t3r4u
a3l3m4ë
o3r3p4u
o3r3g4o
a3b3s3c4e
o3r3t4a
o3b3s3k4u
e3r3b3sh4a
o3m3p4e
a3p3sh3m3j4a
o3r3sh3k3r4i
i3r3t3d3j4e
o3r3n4a
o3s3z3gj4i
a3n3ç4u
e3kë
o3z3sh4i
ë3sh3k3r4u
ë3n3sh3k3r4i
u3r3t4i
i3n3d3r4e
ë3r3v4ë
o3s3f3sh4e
o3te
e3r3dh3m4a
e3n3s4e
o3m3p4a
ë3n3t3r4o
o3l3f4a
y3z3j4e
i3r3dh3n4i
e3m3b3j4e
a4j3mthi
y3ve
e4j3ta
e3pe
a3c3k4e
u3zh3nj4a
y3n3d3sh4i
ë3n3sh3k3r4u
ë3r3g3r4i
a3v3ll4a
e3r3ç4i
i3t3n4a
i3t3sh3m4i
e4j3pru
i3n3g3t4o
i3th3r4ë
y3m3t4a
y3çu
e3r3sh4i
ë3s3t4e
a3ll3m4a
i3n3s3t4u
e3th3sh3k3r4u
o3r3l4a
o4j3mja
o3he
e3zh3g4o
i3f3l4e
ë3l3s4o
ë3ja
a3çi
a3g3sh3t4e
e3r3b4e
u3z3t4e
o3g3r4ë
i3th3k4a
ë3n3v4e
e3n3k4u
y3sh3k3sh3m4e
u3k3t4o
i3f3sh4ë
u3d3n4i
e3p3b4i
a4j3za
e3gj3l4i
ë3sh3t4ë
ë3rr3d3r4u
u3shë
y3t3sh4ë
e4j3zgja
e3nj3k4e
a3r3k3z3g3r4o
a3r3k3sh3k4u
o3bo
a3r3k3zh4a
o3s3z3b4ë
ë3s3m4u
a3r3k3b4o
a3sh3ç4i
i3n3s4o
i4j3më
a3k3sh3m4e
y3r3j4a
i3m3m3b3l4e
a4j3nu
i3hë
e4j3ndri
e3gj3r4ë
a3zh3b4i
o3vu
y3sh3t4o
e3c3j4e
e3c3k4u
i3k3p3r4i
e3t3d4e
o3ç3m4i
a3m3b3r4u
y3r3d3j4a
a3ll3k4u
o3r3n4i
a3my
e3k3t3k4a
u3ç3sh4i
e3s3j3t4o
u3ll3h4e
o3r3t3s3m4u
i3n3c4ë
i3k3s3k4a
y3dh3j4e
e3t3ll4ë
i3dh3t4o
u3r3gj4a
e4j3fe
ë3l3b4e
i3r3t3b3r4e
i3n3k3s4a
y3r3l4ë
y3rë
ë3fi
o3rë
ë3n3g3r4i
a4j3lë
u3l3p3r4ë
o3sh3t3m3j4a
u3m3m4a
e3çë
u3p3r4a
i3z3g3rr4ë
e3p3p4u
a3që
u3n3t4a
a3r3t3j4a
u3sh3k3t4e
e4j3je
o3zë
a3r3dh3m3j4a
i3n3h4a
u3b3l4e
a3r3dh3t4e
a3nu
i3m3ç4ë
a3k3sh4o
e3r3z4i
ë3ji
i3r3n4e
i3z3m4o
a3s3t4o
u4j3ko
ë3ll3z4o
o3t3s4ë
ë3n3d3sh4a
u3v3j4e
u4j3tshë
a3ll3f4e
i3p3th4e
e3k3r4y
i3k3th4e
a3t3v4o
e3b3ll4o
e3p3r4a
a3l3h4a
o3dhë
o3k3rr4u
a3rr3s4ë
e3s3d3r4e
a3t3n4o
e3sh3p4o
a3ho
ë3n3n3d4a
o3c3k3l4a
i3m3b3r4i
a3n3k4a
e3n3d3v4a
i3r3t3b3r4u
y3m3t4o
ë3l3sh4e
i3n3g4u
e3f3sh3t4i
y3p3r4u
u3n3d3t4ë
ë3m3b3r4e
u3r3m3sh3m4e
e3g3m4i
o3z3n4e
e3r3m4a
e3k3t4i
o3s3m4o
a3n3th4i
i3sh3t3p4a
o3p3k4a
a3m3v4a
e3l3m3j4a
a3sh3r4ë
a3z3j4a
o3m3n4ë
o3ki
ë3s3r4e
a3r3gj4ë
u3fe
i3r3t3g4u
e3l3g3r4u
o3h3sh4i
i3p3k4e
ë3m3b3t4e
i3s3j4e
o3t3m4i
e3h3k4e
a3r3k4i
i3sh3t3gj4a
i3p3sh3t4a
a3f3h4a
u3n3g4ë
u3k3s3j4e
ë3r3s3t3r4o
e3r3f4i
u3rr3z3l4a
o3q3sh4ë
a3n3s3k4o
e3m3b3sh4i
e4j3sfe
a3n3b4ë
a3p3s3k4a
e3s3t3r4u
u3rr3sh4a
a3r3dh3j4a
e3fe
a3n3s3j4o
i3r3t3d4a
a3ll3t3j4a
u3llë
ë3d3r4a
u3m3q4a
u3l3k3th4a
a3p3sh3t4u
u3z3n4o
o3n3k4u
i3p3sh3t4e
y3p3n4i
e3p3ç4ë
a3lë
e4j3lo
i3r3k4o
e3r3p4ë
o3zhe
o3zy
ë3r3sh3k3r4e
u3m3z4ë
ë3n3g4u
o3s3s4i
y3g3rr4e
y3th3j4e
u3r3x4o
y3m3r4i
u3s3t4o
u3n3z4o
i3m3j4e
e3rr3l4a
e3du
e4j3tve
ë3sh3p4a
o4j3zë
a3h3m4u
o3n3s3t4ë
e3zi
u3l3p4e
o3s3d4y
e3n3g3sh4ë
e3n3sh3t4e
a3rr3ç4a
o3p3n4e
i3l3nj4ë
a3vi
e4j3ska
ë3sh3n4a
i3m3d4a
i3çe
o3t3f4u
i3qu
a3v3g4o
o3th3sh4i
e4j3tshkri
a3rr3z4i
e3l3m4e
a3m3c4ë
a3r3t3c4e
e3k3sh3j4a
o3l3k4o
y3s3k4i
e3re
u3nj3t4a
ë3n3p4e
o3c3k3l4e
o4j3të
a3n3x4u
a4j3tu
u3rr3n4o
u3s3n4i
a3r3k3r4ë
i3mi
i3sho
e3f3k4ë
y3m3f4e
a3k3sh4i
e3r3p4o
e3r3b4ë
e3l3th4i
o3s3z3gj4e
a3t3l4u
a3r3c4a
i3k3sh3m3j4a
a4j3sa
ë3h3j4e
a3r3t3k4a
ë3sh3q4e
